Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act:

(1) Committee means the committee of the Legislature designated by the Legislature to conduct proceedings regarding a petition filed under the act;

(2) Petitioner means a candidate whose name appeared on the ballot at a general election to represent a legislative district as a member of the Legislature who files a petition under the act; and

(3) Respondent member means a candidate proclaimed duly elected to represent the legislative district for which the petitioner was seeking election.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 9.